Hawaii statutes.
[§323F-60] Strategic commitment during term
of lease. (a) The private entity shall be committed to supporting the
nonprofit management entity and any transferred facility to achieve excellence
and improve access to services in Maui county.

(b) The private entity and the nonprofit
management entity shall establish a governance and management structure for a
transferred facility that seeks to improve its performance. The private entity
and the nonprofit management entity shall apply efficiencies of scale,
consolidation of shared services, and administrative and technological
expertise to improve the health care performance of a transferred facility.

(c) The private entity and the nonprofit
management entity shall support a transferred facility in:

(1) Expanding primary care access throughout Maui;

(2) Recruiting and rotating specialists to fill
current service gaps;

(3) Extending the private entity or its nonprofit
management entity's service line coordination to Maui, including but not
limited to cancer, cardiology, orthopedics, mental health, pediatrics, and
women's health services;

(4) Coordinating long-term care patients and reducing
wait lists;

(5) Upgrading facilities and equipment as needed to
provide high quality care and to enhance patient experience; and

(6) Incorporating the Maui region into the private
entity or its nonprofit management entity's value-based contracting initiatives
to better align quality and cost initiatives. [L 2015, c 103, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next